cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Vzpěrací trenažéry a posilovací stojany > Posilovací stroje kladkové: Protisměrné kladky; Funkční trenažéry; Stroje na stahování kladky; Multifunkční posilovací věže
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Μηχανήματα & δοκοί άρσης βαρών > Μηχανήματα άρσης βαρών με τροχαλίες: Μηχανήματα crossover; Μηχανήματα λειτουργικής προπόνησης; Τροχαλίες πλάτης; Πολυόργανα γυμναστικής
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Машини за вдигане на тежести и стойки > Силови скрипци: Кабелни кросоувър машини; Функционални тренажори; Машини за скрипец; Многофункционални домашни фитнес системи
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Sunkiosios atletikos treniruokliai ir stelažai > Sunkiosios atletikos treniruokliai su skriemuliais: Kabelinių kryžminių traukos treniruokliai; Funkciniai treniruokliai; Viršutinės traukos treniruokliai; Daugiafunkciai namų sporto treniruokliai
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Силовые тренажеры, рамы и стойки > Блочные силовые тренажеры: Тренажеры-кроссоверы; Многофункциональные силовые тренажеры; Тренажеры для вертикальной тяги; Домашние мультистанции
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Súlyemelő gépek és állványok > Súlyemelő gépek csigával: Keresztcsigás gépek; Funkcionális trénerek; Hátlehúzó gépek; Kombinált fitneszgépek
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > ウェイトリフティングマシン > プーリーシステム ウェイトリフティングマシン: ケーブルクロスオーバーマシン; ファンクショナルトレーナー; ラットプルダウンマシン; マルチステーションホームジム
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Aparelhos e suportes para levantamento de peso > Aparelhos para levantamento de peso com polias: Máquinas de crossover; Estações de treinamento funcional; Máquinas de puxada; Estações de musculação residenciais
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > เครื่องยกน้ำหนักและแร็ค > เครื่องยกน้ำหนักพร้อมรอก: เครื่องเคเบิลครอสโอเวอร์; เครื่องฟังก์ชันนัลเทรนเนอร์; เครื่องแรตพูลดาวน์; ชุดโฮมยิมแบบมัลติสเตชัน
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Vzpieračské stroje a stojany > Vzpieračské stroje s kladkami: Crossover posilňovacie stroje; Funkčné trenažéry; Stroje na sťahovanie hornej kladky; Domáce posilňovne viacúčelové
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Aparate și stații de antrenament pentru ridicat greutăți > Aparate pentru ridicat greutăți cu scripeți: Aparate crossover cu cabluri; Aparate de antrenament funcțional; Aparate pentru tracțiuni la scripete; Stații de fitness multifuncționale pentru acasă
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri > Makaralı Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri: Cable crossover makineleri; Fonksiyonel antrenman makineleri; Lat pulldown makineleri; Çok fonksiyonlu çalışma istasyonları
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Macchine e rastrelliere per sollevamento pesi > Macchine per sollevamento pesi con pulegge: Macchine per cavi incrociati; Stazioni multifunzione; Lat machine; Palestre multifunzione da casa
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 역기 운동 기구/거치대 > 도르래식 역기 운동 기구: 케이블 크로스오버 머신; 펑셔널 트레이너; 랫 풀다운 머신; 멀티 스테이션 홈짐
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Maskiner och ställningar för styrketräning > Tyngdlyftningsmaskiner med remskivor: Kryssdragsmaskiner; Funktionella träningsmaskiner; Latsdragsmaskiner; Multigym för hemmabruk
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 推举机 > 带滑轮的举重机: 绳索飞鸟训练器; 功能性训练器; 高位下拉训练器; 多站式家用综合训练器
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Vektløftingsmaskiner og -stativer > Vektløftingsmaskiner med trinser: Kryssdragapparater; Funksjonelle treningsstasjoner; Nedtrekksapparater; Multigym for hjemmebruk
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Krachtapparatuur en -rekken > Krachtapparatuur met riemschijven: Cable crossover-machines; Functional trainers; Lat pulldown-machines; Multistation-homegyms
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Krafttrainingsgeräte > Krafttrainingsgeräte mit Seilzügen: Kabelzugmaschinen; Functional Trainer; Latzugmaschinen; Multistation-Kraftstationen
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Giàn tập tạ > Giàn tập tạ có ròng rọc: Máy kéo cáp đôi; Máy tập đa năng Functional Trainer; Máy kéo xô; Giàn tạ đa năng tại nhà
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Atlasy treningowe i stelaże na ciężary > Atlasy z krążkami: Bramy treningowe; Trenażery funkcjonalne; Wyciągi górne; Atlasy treningowe wielostanowiskowe
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Machines d’haltérophilie et supports pour barres > Machines d’haltérophilie avec poulies: Poulies vis-à-vis; Appareils d’entraînement fonctionnel; Machines à tirage dorsal; Appareils de musculation multifonctions
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Sprave i stalci za dizanje utega > Sprave za dizanje utega s koloturnicima: Strojevi za križanje kabela; Funkcionalni trenažeri; Strojevi za zgibove; Višenamjenske kućne teretane
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Vægtløftningsmaskiner > Vægtløftningsmaskiner med remskiver: Cable crossover-maskiner; Functional trainers; Nedtræksmaskiner; Multistationer til hjemmetræning
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Máquinas de levantamiento de pesas > Máquinas de levantamiento de pesas con poleas: Máquinas de cruce de poleas; Entrenadores funcionales; Máquinas de jalón al pecho; Gimnasios domésticos multiestación
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Racks e máquinas de halterofilismo > Máquinas para halterofilismo com pulleys: Máquinas de crossover com cabos; Máquinas de treino funcional; Máquinas de puxada na dorsal; Ginásios em casa multiestações
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Painonnostolaitteet ja -telineet > Painonnostolaitteet taljoilla: Ristikkäistaljat; Toiminnalliset taljat; Ylätaljalaitteet; Monitoimilaitteet
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Stroji in stojala za dvigovanje uteži > Naprave za dvigovanje uteži na škripcih: Naprave s prekrižanimi kabli; Funkcionalni trenerji; Vlečne naprave za hrbet; Večnamenske domače telovadnice
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Weight Lifting Machines & Racks > Weight Lifting Machines with Pulleys: Cable Crossover Machines; Functional Trainers; Lat Pulldown Machines; Multi-Station Home Gyms
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 重量訓練機 > 滑輪重量訓練機: 飛鳥繩索訓練機; 多功能訓練機; 滑輪下拉機; 多站式家用健身機